Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.803

Savings.

Nothing in this chapter nor in the amendment of RCW 43.17.010, 43.17.020, or * 43.33.070 shall be construed to affect any existing rights acquired under RCW 43.17.010, 43.17.020, or * 43.33.070 except as to the governmental agencies referred to and their officials and employees, nor as affecting any actions, activities, or proceedings validated thereunder, nor as affecting any civil or criminal proceedings instituted thereunder, nor any rule, regulation, or order promulgated thereunder, nor any administrative action taken thereunder; and neither the abolition of any agency or division thereof nor any transfer of powers, duties, and functions as provided in this chapter shall affect the validity of any act performed by such agency or division thereof or any officer thereof prior to the effective date of transfer as provided in RCW 41.50.030.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 16.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.33.070 was repealed by 1981 c 3 s 48, effective July 1, 1981.